Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Chapter 36

Municipal Energy Authority Act

7-36-101.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Municipal Energy Authority Act”.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1 enacted a new chapter 41, §§7-41-101 —7-41-132, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 36, §§7-36-101 —7-36-132 by authority of the Code Commission.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 3. April 27, 2016.

7-36-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Acquire” means to construct or to acquire by purchase, lease, lease-purchase, devise, gift, exercise of the power of eminent domain, or exercise of any other mode of acquisition;

“Associated municipality” means a municipality that is located in a county having a population of three hundred thirty-five thousand (335,000) or less, according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and that, as of the date an authority is formed under this chapter, operates an electric system under the authority of chapter 52 of this title; the municipality's charter; or otherwise applicable law;

“Authority” means an authority created pursuant to this chapter;

“Board” means the board of directors of the authority;

“Bonds” means bonds, interim certificates, notes, debentures, lease-purchase agreements, and all other evidences of indebtedness either issued by or the payment of which has been assumed by the authority;

“Dispose” means to sell, lease, convey, or otherwise transfer any property or any interest in property of the authority;

“Electric service” means the furnishing of electric power and energy for lighting, heating, power, or any other purpose for which electric power and energy can be used;

“Energy” means any and all forms of energy no matter how or where generated or produced;

“Federal agency” means the United States, the president of the United States, the Tennessee Valley authority, and any other authority, agency, instrumentality, or corporation of the United States;

“Governing body” means the legislative body of the associated municipality creating an authority pursuant to this chapter or, as applicable in § 7-36-110, the legislative body of another municipality;

“Improve” means to construct, reconstruct, repair, extend, enlarge, or alter;

“Improvement” means any extension, betterment, or addition to any system;

“Municipal bonds” means bonds of the associated municipality issued to finance or refinance any of the systems;

“Municipal electric system” means the electric system division or department of the associated municipality;

“Municipality” means any county or incorporated city or town within or outside this state;

“Person” means any natural person, firm, association, corporation, limited liability company, business trust, partnership, or governmental entity;

“Refunding bonds” means bonds of the authority issued to refund all or any part of bonds of the authority or the municipal bonds;

“Supervisory board” means the board of public utilities or other similar body of the associated municipality, as such board is constituted as of the date an authority is formed pursuant to this chapter;

“System” means any plant, works, facility, property, or parts thereof, together with all appurtenances thereto, used or useful in connection with the furnishing of any of the services and commodities authorized to be provided in this chapter, including generation or production facilities, transmission facilities, storage facilities, and distribution facilities, and all real and personal property of every nature comprising part of or used or useful in connection with a “system”, and all appurtenances, contracts, leases, franchises, and other intangibles relating to a “system”;

“Telecommunications service” means telephone, cable television, voice, data, or video transmissions, video programming, Internet access and related services, load control, meter reading, appliance monitoring, power exchange, and billing, or any other telecommunications services or similar or component service that may be provided, as allowed by law, including servicing and repairing related equipment, regardless of the facilities used;

“Wastewater service” means the collection, transportation, and treatment of water discharged from residential, commercial, industrial, or other processes for final discharge to the environment; and

“Water service” means the procurement, treatment, and distribution of water for domestic use or any other purpose for which water can be used.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1; 2017, ch. 446, §§ 1-3.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1 enacted a new chapter 41, §§7-41-101 —7-41-132, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 36, §§7-36-101 —7-36-132 by authority of the Code Commission.

Compiler's Notes. For U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

2017 Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in the definition of “Associated municipality”, deleted “has adopted home rule, that” preceding “is located in”, substituted “three hundred thirty-five thousand (335,000)” for “one hundred fifty thousand (150,000)” following “population of”, and substituted “this title; the municipality's charter;” for “this title, the municipality's home rule charter,” following “chapter 52 of”; in the definition of “System”, inserted “storage facilities,” preceding “and distribution facilities”; and added definitions of “Wastewater service”; and “Water service”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 3. April 27, 2016.

Acts 2017, ch. 446, § 19. May 25, 2017.

7-36-103. Formation of authority.

If the governing body of an associated municipality, by appropriate resolution, duly adopted by a two-thirds (2/3) or greater vote, finds and determines that it is wise, expedient, necessary, or advisable that an authority be formed, it shall authorize the mayor of the associated municipality or other person to proceed to form an authority, and shall approve the form of certificate of incorporation proposed to be used in organizing the authority, and then the mayor or other person authorized by the resolution shall execute, acknowledge, and file a certificate of incorporation for the corporation as provided in this chapter.

No authority may be formed pursuant to this chapter unless the governing body has adopted a resolution as provided in this section.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1 enacted a new chapter 41, §§7-41-101 —7-41-132, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 36, §§7-36-101 —7-36-132 by authority of the Code Commission.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 3. April 27, 2016.

7-36-104. Certificate of incorporation.

The certificate of incorporation shall set forth:

The name of the authority;

A recital that permission to organize the authority has been granted by resolution duly adopted by the governing body of the associated municipality and the date of the adoption of the resolution;

The location of the principal office of the authority;

The purposes for which the authority is proposed to be organized;

The number of directors of the authority;

The period for the duration of the authority, if other than perpetual; and

Any other matter that the governing body of the associated municipality may choose to insert in the certificate of incorporation, which shall not be inconsistent with this chapter or with the laws of this state. It shall not be necessary to set forth in the certificate of incorporation the powers enumerated in this chapter.

The certificate of incorporation shall be acknowledged by the mayor of the associated municipality or other person authorized by the resolution described in § 7-36-103 before an officer authorized by the laws of this state to take acknowledgments of deeds.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1 enacted a new chapter 41, §§7-41-101 —7-41-132, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 36, §§7-36-101 —7-36-132 by authority of the Code Commission.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 3. April 27, 2016.

7-36-105. Filing and approval of certificate of incorporation — Creation of authority — Corporate name.

When executed and acknowledged in conformity with § 7-36-104, the certificate of incorporation shall be filed with the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall examine the certificate of incorporation and, if the secretary of state finds that the recitals contained in the certificate of incorporation are correct, that the requirements of § 7-36-104 have been complied with, and that the name is not identical with or so nearly similar to that of another entity already in existence in this state as to lead to confusion and uncertainty, then the secretary of state shall approve the certificate of incorporation and record it in an appropriate book of record in the secretary of state's office.

When the certificate has been made, filed, and approved, the corporate existence shall begin, and the certificate shall be conclusive evidence that the authority has been formed pursuant to this chapter.

Upon its formation, a governmental authority shall be created and constituted. The authority shall be a public corporation under the corporate name set forth in its certificate of incorporation, and shall under that name be a political subdivision of this state and a body politic and corporate. The authority shall be for the purpose of planning, acquiring, constructing, improving, furnishing, equipping, financing, owning, operating, and maintaining electric, water, and wastewater systems, and telecommunications systems as are specified in its certificate of incorporation. The authority may provide such services within or outside the corporate limits of the associated municipality and within or outside this state.

An authority may elect to adopt one (1) or more assumed corporate names other than its true corporate name. Before conducting affairs in this state under an assumed corporate name or names, the authority shall, for each assumed corporate name, pursuant to resolution by its board of directors, execute and file an application with the secretary of state setting forth the true corporate name of the authority as stated in its certificate of incorporation, that the authority intends to transact business under an assumed corporate name, and the assumed corporate name which it proposes to use. An authority may, by resolution of its board of directors, amend or withdraw any of its assumed corporate names by filing notice of such amendment or withdrawal with the secretary of state.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1; 2017, ch. 446, § 4.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1 enacted a new chapter 41, §§7-41-101 —7-41-132, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 36, §§7-36-101 —7-36-132 by authority of the Code Commission.

2017 Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in (c), substituted “electric, water, and wastewater systems,” for “electric utility” preceding “and telecommunications systems” and inserted “as are specified in its certificate of incorporation. The authority may provide such services” preceding “within or outside”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 3. April 27, 2016. Acts 2017, ch. 446, § 19. May 25, 2017.

7-36-106. Amendment of certificate of incorporation.

The certificate of incorporation may, at any time, be amended so as to make any changes in the certificate of incorporation and add any provisions to the certificate of incorporation that might have been included in the original certificate of incorporation.

An amendment to the certificate of incorporation shall be effected in the following manner:

The members of the board of directors of the authority shall file with the governing body of the associated municipality an application in writing seeking permission to amend the certificate of incorporation, specifying in such application the amendment proposed to be made;

The governing body shall consider the application and, if it shall, by appropriate resolution, duly find and determine that it is wise, expedient, necessary, or advisable that the proposed amendment be made and shall authorize the amendment to be made and shall approve the form of the proposed amendment, then the persons making application shall execute an instrument embodying the amendment specified in the application, and shall file the application with the secretary of state;

The proposed amendment shall be subscribed and acknowledged by each member of the board of directors before an officer authorized by the laws of this state to take acknowledgments to deeds; and

The secretary of state shall examine the proposed amendment and, if the secretary of state finds that the requirements of this section have been complied with and the proposed amendment is within the scope of what might be included in an original certificate of incorporation pursuant to § 7-36-104, then the secretary of state shall approve the amendment and record it in an appropriate book in the secretary of state's office.

When an amendment has been made, filed, and approved, it shall become effective and the certificate of incorporation shall be amended pursuant to subsection (b) to the extent provided in the amendment.

No certificate of incorporation shall be amended except in the manner provided in this section.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1 enacted a new chapter 41, §§7-41-101 —7-41-132, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 36, §§7-36-101 —7-36-132 by authority of the Code Commission.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 3. April 27, 2016.

7-36-107. Powers of authority.

The authority is authorized, effective immediately upon the effective date of its formation, either singly or jointly with one (1) or more persons, municipalities, or federal agencies, or with this state, or with one (1) or more agencies or instrumentalities of this state or any municipality:

To sue and be sued;

To have a seal and alter the same at pleasure;

To acquire, construct, improve, furnish, equip, finance, own, operate, and maintain within or outside the corporate limits of the associated municipality, a system for the furnishing of electrical service and to provide electric service to any person, governmental entity, or other user or consumer of electric services within or outside the associated municipality. The system shall be operated as a financially separate system independent of, and financially separate from, the other utility systems of the authority, and, except to the extent the authority succeeds to the rights and powers of the municipal electric system, the authority shall not exercise any of the powers granted in this subdivision (a)(3) wholly or partly within the legal boundaries of an incorporated city or town or electric cooperative, except as allowed by law;

To acquire, construct, improve, furnish, equip, finance, own, operate, and maintain, within or outside the corporate limits of the associated municipality, a system for the furnishing of water service and to provide water service to any person, governmental entity, or other user or consumer of water services within or outside the associated municipality; provided, the system shall be operated as a financially separate system independent of, and financially separate from, the other utility systems of the authority and managed by the water division of the authority; and provided, further, the authority shall not exercise any of the powers granted in this subdivision (a)(4) wholly or partly within the legal boundaries of a utility district incorporated pursuant to the Utility District Act of 1937, compiled in chapter 82 of this title, or any other municipality, except to the extent the authority succeeds to the rights and powers of a municipal water system or except as allowed by law, without the consent of the governing body of such utility district or municipality;

To acquire, construct, improve, furnish, equip, finance, own, operate, and maintain within or outside the corporate limits of the associated municipality, a system for providing wastewater service to any person, governmental entity, or other user or consumer of wastewater services within and outside the associated municipality; provided, the system shall be operated as a financially separate system independent of, and financially separate from, the other utility systems of the authority and managed by the wastewater division of the authority; and provided, further, the authority shall not exercise any of the powers granted in this subdivision (a)(5) wholly or partly within the legal boundaries of a utility district incorporated pursuant to the Utility District Act of 1937, or any other municipality, except to the extent the authority succeeds to the rights and powers of the municipal wastewater system or except as allowed by law, without the consent of the governing body of such utility district or municipality;

To acquire, construct, improve, furnish, equip, finance, own, operate, and maintain within and outside the corporate limits of the associated municipality, a system for the furnishing of telecommunications service and to provide telecommunications service to any person, governmental entity, or other user or consumer of telecommunications services within or outside the associated municipality. The system shall be operated as a financially separate system independent of, and financially separate from, the other utility systems of the authority; provided:

To the extent that the authority, or any joint venture, partnership, or cooperative arrangement of which the authority is a party, or any limited liability company or not-for-profit corporation of which the authority is a member provides telephone or telegraph services, the authority, or such other entity, shall be subject to regulation by the Tennessee public utility commission in the same manner and to the same extent as other certified providers of such services, including, but not limited to, rules or orders governing anticompetitive practices, and shall be considered as and have the duties of a public utility, as defined in § 65-4-101, but only to the extent necessary to effect such duties and only with respect to the authority's provision of telephone and telegraph services;

The authority shall have all the powers and authority conferred upon municipalities by §§ 7-52-401; 7-52-402; 7-52-403; 7-52-405; 7-52-406; 7-52-601 — 7-52-605, but excluding any requirement under § 7-52-603(a)(1)(A) to create multiple divisions for telecommunications services; and §§ 7-52-609 — 7-52-611. In the exercise of such powers, the authority shall be subject to all the obligations, restrictions, and limitations imposed upon municipalities by those sections and imposed upon providers of the services described in those sections by federal law. All actions authorized by those sections to be taken by the board or supervisory body having responsibility for a municipal electric plant shall be authorized to be taken by the board of directors of the authority and all powers granted to a municipal electric system under those statutes shall be exercised by the electric division of the authority;

Nothing in this subdivision (a)(6) operates to restrict or impair in any way the ability of the authority to acquire, construct, improve, furnish, equip, finance, own, operate, and maintain a telecommunications system or to offer or provide telecommunications services through one (1) or more other systems of the authority, if such system and services are related to the provision of services of such system or the operation of the system, including, without limitation, load control, meter reading, appliance monitoring, power exchange, billing, or any other similar or component service; and

Notwithstanding this chapter to the contrary, the authority shall be subject to the territorial limitations set forth in § 7-52-601 in the same manner and to the same extent as such limitations apply from time to time to a municipal electric system providing services pursuant to § 7-52-601;

To fix, levy, charge, and collect fees, rents, tolls, or other charges for the use of, or in connection with, any system of the authority as shall be consistent with the provision of the services pursuant to this chapter or sale or other disposition of the commodities provided by the various utilities authorized in this section based on cost, sound economy, public good, and prudent business operations, which fees, rents, tolls, or charges shall be established by the board without the necessity of review or approval by any other municipality, the state, or any commission or authority thereof or any federal agency other than as provided in federal statutes or contracts and other than as provided in subdivision (a)(6). Whenever any fees, rents, tolls, or other charges for telephone or telegraph services regulated pursuant to subdivision (a)(6) are to change, such fees, rents, tolls, or charges shall be established by the board and be subject to review and approval by the Tennessee public utility commission in the same manner and to the same extent as other certified providers of such services;

To acquire, hold, own, and dispose of property, real and personal, tangible and intangible, or interests therein, in its own name, subject to mortgages or other liens or otherwise and to pay for property in cash or on credit through installment payments, and to secure the payment of all or any part of any installment obligations in connection with any acquisition;

To have complete control and supervision of any system of the authority and to make such rules governing the rendering of service thereby as may be just and reasonable;

To contract debts, borrow money, issue bonds, and enter into lease-purchase agreements to acquire, construct, improve, furnish, equip, extend, operate, or maintain any system, or any part thereof, or to provide the authority's share of the funding for any joint undertaking or project, and to assume and agree to pay any indebtedness incurred for any of the purposes described in this subdivision (a)(10);

To accept gifts or grants of money or property, real or personal, and voluntary and uncompensated services or other financial assistance from any person, state agency, federal agency, or municipality, for, or in aid of, the acquisition or improvement of any system;

To accept and distribute excess receipts for bona fide economic development or community assistance purposes pursuant to programs approved by the board, which programs may include, but are not limited to, programs in which bills to customers are rounded up to the next dollar when the amount of any excess receipt due to rounding is shown as a separate line on the bill, and excess receipts accepted pursuant to such programs are not considered revenue to the authority, and the authority may only use the excess receipts for economic development or community assistance purposes;

An authority that establishes a program authorized by subdivision (a)(12)(A) on or after January 1, 2021, shall not enroll any customer into the program without the express consent of the customer;

A customer who is enrolled in a program authorized by subdivision (a)(12)(A) may opt out of the program by providing notice to the authority of the customer's desire to cease participation in the program;

Upon receiving an opt-out notice from a customer, the authority shall remove the customer from enrollment in the program no later than the first day of the customer's next regular billing cycle that begins no fewer than thirty (30) days after the date of the customer's opt-out notice;

Any authority that on June 3, 2019, utilizes a program authorized by subdivision (a)(12)(A) and operates the program on an opt-out basis shall send a written notice to each customer of the authority no later than November 1, 2020, that contains, but is not limited to, the following information:

A statement that the authority utilizes a program authorized by subdivision (a)(12)(A), the program is operated on an opt-out basis, and a description of the program;

Notification that a customer whose bill is currently rounded up by the authority has the right to opt out of participation in the program; and

Contact information for the authority and instructions on how the customer may contact the authority to opt out of participation in the program;

The written notice required by this subdivision (a)(12)(C) may be provided to the customer by electronic means and may accompany a regular billing statement, at the discretion of the authority;

A municipal utility system that on June 3, 2019, utilizes a program authorized by subdivision (a)(12)(A) and operates the program on an opt-out basis that fails to send the notice required by this subdivision (a)(12)(C) shall, on and after January 1, 2021, cease operating the program on an opt-out basis and shall not operate a program unless operated in compliance with subdivision (a)(12)(B); and

For purposes of this subdivision (a)(12), “opt-out basis” means automatically enrolling customers in a program and requiring notice from the customer of a desire to be removed from the program in order to cease participation in the program; and

Any authority that utilizes a program authorized by subdivision (a)(12)(A) and that maintains a website that is accessible by the general public shall publish in a conspicuous location on the website by November 1, 2020, and throughout the duration of the authority's utilization of the program, the following information:

A statement that the authority utilizes a program authorized by subdivision (a)(12)(A) and a description of the program;

Notification that a customer whose bill is currently rounded up by the authority has the right to opt out of participation in the program; and

Contact information for the utility and instructions on how the customer may contact the utility to opt into or out of participation in the program;

To condemn either the fee or such right, title, interest, or easement in property as the board may deem necessary for any of the purposes mentioned in this chapter, and such property or interest in such property may be so acquired whether or not the same is owned or held for public use by corporations, associations, or persons having the power of eminent domain, or otherwise held or used for public purposes, and such power of condemnation may be exercised in the method of procedure prescribed by title 29, chapter 16, or in the method of procedure prescribed by any other applicable statutory provisions for the exercise of the power of eminent domain; provided, however, that where title to any property sought to be condemned is defective, it shall be passed by decree of court. Where condemnation proceedings become necessary, the court in which such proceedings are filed shall, upon application by the authority and upon the posting of a bond with the clerk of the court in such amount as the court may deem commensurate with the value of the property, order that the right of possession shall issue immediately or as soon and upon such terms as the court, in its discretion, may deem proper and just;

To make and execute any contract and instrument necessary or convenient for the full exercise of the powers granted in this section, and in connection therewith to stipulate and agree to such covenants, terms, and conditions, and such term or duration as shall be appropriate, including, without limitation, contracts for the purchase or sale of any of the commodities or services authorized in this section to be provided by the authority, and carry out and perform the covenants, terms, and conditions of such contracts and instruments. In connection with any contract to acquire or sell any of the commodities or services authorized in this section, the authority may enter into commodity price exchange or swap agreements, agreements establishing price floors or ceilings, or both, or other price hedging contracts with any person or entity under such terms and conditions as the authority may determine, including, without limitation, provisions permitting the authority to indemnify or otherwise pay any person or entity for any loss of benefits under such agreement upon early termination thereof or default thereunder. When entering into any such contract or arrangement or any such swap, exchange, or hedging agreement evidencing a transaction bearing a reasonable relationship to this state and also to another state or nation, the authority may agree in the written contract or agreement that the rights and remedies of the parties thereto shall be governed by the laws of this state or the laws of such other state or nation; provided, that jurisdiction over the authority shall lie solely in the courts sitting in the county where the authority's principal office is located. Nothing in the selection of laws of another state or nation shall alter, impair, or modify the rights, privileges, and obligations of the authority as a governmental entity under this chapter and under the laws of this state;

To sell, exchange, or interchange any of the commodities or services authorized to be provided in this section either within or outside this state and to establish prices to be paid for such commodities or services, and establish pricing structures with respect thereto, including provision for price rebates, discounts, and dividends; and, in connection with any such sales, exchanges, or interchanges, to act as agent for such consumers, to secure contracts and arrangements with other entities or persons, to make contracts for the sale, exchange, interchange, pooling, transmission, storage, or distribution of any of the commodities or services authorized to be provided in this section, inside or outside this state, and to transmit, transport, and distribute any such commodities or services both for itself and on behalf of others;

To make contracts and execute instruments containing such covenants, terms, and conditions as may be necessary, proper, or advisable for the purpose of obtaining loans from any source, or grants, loans, or other financial assistance from the state or any federal agency, and to carry out and perform the covenants and terms and conditions of all such contracts and instruments;

To enter on any lands, waters, and premises for the purpose of making surveys, soundings, and examinations in connection with the acquisition, improvement, operation, or maintenance of any system and the furnishing of any of the services authorized to be provided in this section;

To use any right-of-way, easement, or other similar property right necessary or convenient in connection with the acquisition, improvement, operation, or maintenance of one (1) or more systems, held by this state, the associated municipality, or any other municipality; provided, that such other municipality shall consent to such use;

To provide to any municipality, person, federal agency, this state, or any agency or instrumentality thereof, transmission, storage, or transportation capacity for any of the commodities or services authorized in this section, and management and purchasing services associated therewith;

To employ, engage, retain, and pay compensation to such officers, agents, consultants, professionals, and employees of the authority as shall be necessary to operate the systems, manage the affairs of the authority, and otherwise further the purposes of the authority and the exercise of the powers thereof, and to fix their compensation and to establish a program of employee benefits, including a retirement system;

To establish a retirement system for all employees of the authority and to maintain all rights and benefits of employees as they existed under the retirement system of the municipal electric system without diminution;

To enter into joint ventures and cooperative arrangements with one (1) or more persons, including the formation of a partnership, limited liability company, or not-for-profit corporation to accomplish any of the purposes set forth in this section or to exercise any of the powers set forth in this section;

Upon proper action by the associated municipality, to commence operating the systems and to exercise exclusive control and direction of the systems and, upon proper action by the associated municipality, to accept title to the assets and assume the liabilities of the systems, and upon such action to hold all the rights as existed with the municipal electric system without diminution;

To do business under one (1) or more assumed corporate names pursuant to § 7-36-105(d);

To manage and operate utility systems owned by other persons. Such management or operating agreements shall be consistent with subdivision (a)(3), as applicable;

To enter into mutual aid agreements with other utility systems and other persons;

To assist persons to whom the authority sells electric power, energy, water, wastewater, or telecommunications in installing fixtures, appliances, apparatus, and equipment of all kinds and character and, in connection therewith, to purchase, acquire, lease, sell, distribute, make loans, provide service contracts, and repair such fixtures, appliances, apparatus, and equipment and sell, assign, transfer, endorse, pledge, and otherwise dispose of notes or other evidences of indebtedness any and all types of security therefor;

To have such powers as are now or hereafter authorized for municipal electric, water, and wastewater utilities within this state; and

To do any act authorized in this section or necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly given in this chapter under, through, or by means of its own officers, agents, and employees, or by contracts with any person, federal agency, or municipality.

The authority's water and wastewater systems shall have all the powers, authority, duties, obligations, requirements, and oversight that are conferred and imposed upon municipalities and a municipality's water and wastewater system in title 68, chapter 221. All actions authorized and required by title 68, chapter 221 to be taken by the board or supervisory body having responsibility for a municipality's water or wastewater system shall be authorized to be taken by the board of directors of the authority, and all powers, authority, duties, obligations, requirements, and oversight granted to and required of a municipality's water and wastewater system under title 68, chapter 221 shall be exercised by the water and wastewater divisions of the authority.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1; 2017, ch. 94, §§ 11, 79; 2017, ch. 446, §§ 5-11; 2019, ch. 508, § 2.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1 enacted a new chapter 41, §§7-41-101 —7-41-132, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 36, §§7-36-101 —7-36-132 by authority of the Code Commission.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment by ch. 94, substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” near the middle of (4)(A); and in the second sentence of (5).

The 2017 amendment by ch. 446, designated the existing language as (a); added present (a)(4) and (a)(5); redesignated former (4) through (27) as present (a)(6) through (a)(29); in present (a)(6)(C), substituted “operates” for “shall operate” preceding “to restrict”, “one (1) or more other systems of the authority” for “its electric system” following “through”, “services of such system or the operation of the system” for “electric service or the operation of the electric system” following “the provision of”; in present (a)(7), substituted “subdivision (6)” for “subdivision (4)” twice; in present (a)(15), inserted “storage,” preceding “or distribution”; in present (a)(19), inserted “storage,” preceding “or transportation”; in present (a)(27), inserted “the authority sells” following “to whom”, “water, wastewater, or telecommunications” for “or telecommunications is sold” preceding “in installing”, and “types” for “type” preceding “of security”; in present (28), substituted “municipal electric, water, and wastewater utilities” for “electric systems of municipalities,” following “authorized for”; and added (b).

The 2019 amendment rewrote (a)(12) which read, “To accept and distribute voluntary contributions for bona fide economic development or community assistance purposes pursuant to programs approved by the board, which programs may include, but shall not be limited to, programs in which bills to customers are rounded up to the next dollar when such contribution is shown as a separate line on the bill, and contributions accepted pursuant to such programs shall not be considered revenue to the authority and such contributions shall be used only for economic development or community assistance purposes;”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 3. April 27, 2016.

Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Acts 2017, ch. 446, § 19. May 25, 2017.

Acts 2019, ch. 508, § 6. June 3, 2019.

7-36-108. Independent operation of utility system.

Each system of the authority shall operate independently of the others and shall be self-sustaining, except insofar as the board may by resolution combine any of the systems which, in the opinion of the board, shall be advisable and economical and which by the general laws of the state or any federal laws or any contracts or indentures are not required to be operated separately. Telecommunications service shall continue to be maintained as a separate division pursuant to §7-36-107(a)(6).

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1; 2017, ch. 446, § 12.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1 enacted a new chapter 41, §§7-41-101 —7-41-132, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 36, §§7-36-101 —7-36-132 by authority of the Code Commission.

2017 Amendments. The 2017 amendment deleted “utility” preceding “system” and substituted “insofar as the board may by resolution combine any of the systems which, in the opinion of the board, shall be advisable and economical and which by the general laws of the state or any federal laws or any contracts or indentures are not required to be operated separately. Telecommunications service shall continue to be maintained as a separate division pursuant to §7-36-107(6)” for “as otherwise provided in this chapter” at the end.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 3. April 27, 2016.

Acts 2017, ch. 446, § 19. May 25, 2017.